Idaho, session 2025, S1206.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for
the Division of Early Learning and Development the following amounts to be
expended according to the designated programs and expense classes from the
listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
A. EARLY LEARNING & DEVELOPMENT:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $9,800 $9,800
B. IDAHO CHILD CARE PROGRAM:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 18,227,000 18,227,000
C. SOUTHWEST IDAHO TREATMENT CENTER:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $59,300 $260,900 1,000 321,200
TOTAL $59,300 $260,900 $18,237,800 $18,558,000


SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Divi-
sion of Services for the Developmentally Disabled and the Division of Early
Learning and Development is hereby reduced by the following amounts for the
designated programs and expense classes from the listed funds for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. SERVICES FOR THE DEVELOPMENTALLY DISABLED:
A. EXTENDED EMPLOYMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $244,600 $91,600 $3,202,900 $3,539,100
II. EARLY LEARNING & DEVELOPMENT:
A. EARLY LEARNING & DEVELOPMENT:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $9,800 $9,800
B. SOUTHWEST IDAHO TREATMENT CENTER:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $59,300 $11,700 1,000 72,000
DIVISION TOTAL $59,300 $11,700 $10,800 $81,800
GRAND TOTAL $303,900 $103,300 $3,213,700 $3,620,900
SECTION 3. FTP AUTHORIZATION. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, the full-time equivalent position authorization pro-
vided to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Extended Employment
Services program is hereby reduced by three (3.00) for the period July 1,
2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. IDAHO CHILD CARE PROGRAM. Of the amount appropriated in Sec-
tion 1 of this act, $14,000,000 from the Cooperative Welfare (Federal) Fund
shall be expended for the Idaho Child Care Program to achieve the following
objectives: executing contracts, programs and grants to expand the avail-
ability of licensed and non-licensed home-based child care, community child
care, and after-school child care programs. The director of the Department
of Health and Welfare is prohibited from allocating funds for buildings or


related infrastructure and is directed to find programs needing short-term
investment to help expand long-term availability of child care without cre-
ating a need for ongoing public subsidy.
SECTION 5. FEDERAL FUNDING RESTRICTIONS. Pursuant to Section
67-3511(2), Idaho Code, legislative appropriations shall not be transferred
from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
Appropriations made pursuant to this act contingent on anticipated federal
funding, grants, or programs shall not be supplanted by state funds in the
event of any reduction or elimination of such federal support without leg-
islative approval. The agency receiving the appropriation shall take all
necessary actions to ensure that the state is not obligated to replace lost
federal funds. Pursuant to Section 67-1917, Idaho Code, the agency will
submit an inventory of federal funds utilized by the agency. State funds ap-
propriated to satisfy match requirements for federal funds shall be reverted
to the maximum extent possible if federal funds requiring match are reduced
or eliminated. The agency shall promptly notify the Budget and Policy Anal-
ysis Division of the Legislative Services Office of any significant changes
related to federal funding, grants, or programs. This does not apply to
standard federal funding adjustments that take place within an agency's cost
allocation plan or indirect expenditure plan for indirect costs and agency
support staff, FMAP adjustments, or entitlement programs.
SECTION 6. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.